District of Columbia statutes.
22-3227.04

Restitution.

When a person is convicted of identity theft, the court may, in addition to any other applicable penalty, order restitution for the full amount of financial injury.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 127d
as added Mar. 27, 2004, D.C. Law 15-106, § 2(c), 50 DCR 9809
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(c) of Identity Thief Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-388, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3382).